Georgia, session 2025_26, SB353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 50-14-1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to meetings open
to the public, limitation on action to contest agency action, recording, notice of time and
place, access to minutes, and teleconferences, is amended by revising subsection (h) as
follows:
"(h)(1) The following bodies and committees thereof shall be authorized to conduct
meetings by teleconference, provided that any such meeting shall be considered to be
conducted in compliance with this chapter so long as the notice required by this chapter
is provided and, if fewer than a quorum of the members of a body or committee thereof
S. B. 353
- 1 -

LC 47 3616
are physically present, means have been afforded for the public to have simultaneous
access to the teleconference meeting:
(A) Development authorities created pursuant to or authorized by the provisions of
Chapter 42 or Chapter 62 of Title 36, by or pursuant to Article IX, Section VI,
Paragraph III of the Georgia Constitution, or by or pursuant to any amendment to the
Constitution continued pursuant to the authority of Article XI, Section I, Paragraph IV
of the Constitution;
(B) Community improvement districts created pursuant to the provisions of Article IX,
Section VII of the Georgia Constitution;
(C) Hospital authorities created pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31; and
(D) The board of trustees or other governing body of any large retirement system as
such term is defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-84; and
(E) County or joint boards of election or boards of election and registration established
pursuant to Code Section 21-2-40 or 21-2-40.1.
(2) The participation by teleconference of members of such bodies or committees thereof
means full participation in the same manner as if such members were physically present.
In the event such teleconference meeting is a public hearing, and if fewer than a quorum
of the members of a body or committee thereof are physically present, then members of
the public shall be afforded the means to participate fully in the same manner as if such
members of the public were physically present."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 353
- 2 -